Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1306
Registered environmental health specialist, defined.

Registered environmental health specialist means a person who has the educational requirements and has had experience in the field of environmental sanitation required by section 38-1308 and is certified in accordance with the Environmental Health Specialists Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 527.